District of Columbia statutes.
31-5412

Examination of the Association; annual report.

(a)

The Association shall be subject to examination and regulation by the Mayor.

(b)

The Board of Directors shall submit to the Mayor each year, not later than 120 days after the end of the Association’s fiscal year, a financial report in a form approved by the Mayor and a report of its activities during the preceding fiscal year.

July 22, 1992, D.C. Law 9-129, § 13, 39 DCR 4036
1981 Ed., § 35-1952.